Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-669
Case-specific and patient-identifying data; use in legal proceeding; prohibited.

All case-specific and patient-identifying data furnished and any findings or conclusions resulting from such data shall be privileged communications which may not be used or offered or received in evidence in any legal proceeding of any kind, and any attempt to use or offer any such information, findings, conclusions, or any part thereof, unless waived by the interested parties, shall constitute prejudicial error resulting in a mistrial in any such proceeding.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 7.